Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6726XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 2210 Section 1. Section 692A.102, subsection 1, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (10), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (10) Sexual abuse in the third degree in violation of 3 section 709.4, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , âcâ , or âdâ , or âeâ , 4 if committed by a person fourteen years of age or older. 5 Sec. 2. Section 709.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The person obtains the consent of the 8 other person by the use of fraud, concealment, or artifice, and 9 intentionally deceives the other person regarding the personâs 10 marital status such that a reasonable person would not have 11 consented but for the deception. 12 Sec. 3. Section 709.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. The act is performed after the person 15 obtains the other personâs consent through the use of fraud, 16 concealment, or artifice regarding the personâs marital status, 17 and the person performing the act knows or reasonably should 18 have known that the other person would not have consented but 19 for the deception. 20